src/propernoun-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON HEANDARATUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;                        
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 R ;      
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj: GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-org
! +N+Prop+Org: GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:  GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:  GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur: GEAVNNISDECL ;
 
LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:  GEAVNNISDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:Y7@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS
! +N+Prop: GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON GEAVNNISUCASE
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s K ;
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s R ;     
 +Ess:Q1n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 R ;      
 +Sg+Acc:X4v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ;


LEXICON VARGGAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc: VARGGATDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;



!LEXICON VARGGAT
! +N+Prop: VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ VARGGATUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON VARGGATUCASE
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:Q1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:Q1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q1j K ;
! +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTATDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
 
LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTATDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
! +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 

LEXICON SULLOT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ SULLOTDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON SULLOT
! +N+Prop: SULLOTDECL ;
 
LEXICON SULLOTDECL
 +Ess:Q3n K ;
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
! +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMATDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

!LEXICON EATNAMAT
! +N+Prop: EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij R ;             
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
 
 
 
 
 

! ======================== !
! Proper name lexicon part !
! ======================== !

! A. Manually added Lule Sáme names
!    This is a intermediate solution awaiting the forthcoming
!    language-independent xml name database at gt/common/src/proper-noun.xml


! B. Dump from Northern Sáme
!    These entries are manually dumped here from propernoun-sme-lex.txt.
!    The lines from "LEXICON ProperNoun" and onwards MUST NOT be manually
!    edited, as all editions will be lost each time we dump a new version.
!    The future solution is to have a name file automatically generated 
!    from proper-noun.xml. We are not there yet.


! The present dump has no "3" in it.

LEXICON ProperNoun
Sirges:Sirgge GEAVNNIS-plc ; !village
Aleuhta:Aleuhta ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Aleuhtat:Aleuhta ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Altai^várit:Altai^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Andaman^sullot:Andaman^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Andes^várit:Andes^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Appala^chi^a^várit:Appala^chi^a^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Atlas^várit:Atlas^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Badje^geavŋŋis:Badje^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Bahama^sullot:Bahama^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Balkan^várit:Balkan^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Balleny^sullot:Balleny^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Bermuda^sullot:Bermuda^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Bievák:Bievá SULLOT-plc ;
Bievát:Bievá SULLOT-plc ; !Now it works !SUB
Borše^jávrrit:Borše^jáv'ri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Buođggát:Buođggá VARGGAT-plc ;
Dardaneallat ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB !This can not work
Dardaneallat:Dardanealla ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Davvi^riikkat:Davvi^rij'ka ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Divrrák:Divrrá SULLOT-plc ;
Divrrát:Divrrá SULLOT-plc ; !SUB! Now it works
Dálmmát:Dálmmá VARGGAT-plc ;
Eise^vár^verddet:Eise^vár^verdde ALEUHTAT-org ;
Falk^land^sullot:Falk^land^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Fear^sullot:Fear^suollu SULLOT-plc ; !SUB
Feara^sullot:Feara^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Filippiinnat ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Filippiinnat:Filippij'na ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Filippiinnat:Filippijdna ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Fiži^sullot:Fiži^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Fávle-Iččát:Fávle-Iččá ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Galapagos^sullot:Galapagos^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Gaska-Andaman^sullot:Gaska-Andaman^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Gaza-sárggis:Gaza-sár'gis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Goađát:Goađá SULLOT-plc ;
Gádde-Iččát:Gádde-Iččá ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Gáhtterat:Gáhttera ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Gátterat:Gátter EATNAMAT-plc ;
Hawa^ii^sullot:Hawa^ii^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
He^briiddat:He^brij'da ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Hilssát:Hilssá SULLOT-plc ; ! Now it works
Ihkkot:Ihkko SULLOT-plc ;
Indi^a% sullot:Indi^a% suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Intro-álbmot:Intro-álb'mo ALEUHTAT-org ;
Ivvár^stádik:Ivvár^stádi SULLOT-plc ;
Ivvár^stádit:Ivvár^stádi ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Ivvár^stáđit:Ivvár^stáđi ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Kanári^a^sullot:Kanári^a^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Karoliinnat ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Karoliinnat:Karoliinna ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Karoliinnat:Karolij'na ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Karoliinnat:Karolijdna ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Karpáhta^várit:Karpáhta^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Kaukasus^várit:Kaukasus^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Korálla^mearra^bávttit:Korálla^mearra^bák'ti ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Kuril^sullot:Kuril^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Lakkadiivvat:Lakkadij'va ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Lakko^searat:Lakko^seara ALEUHTAT-org ;
Luosttat:Luostta VARGGAT-plc ;
Malediivvat:Maledij'va ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Malvinas^sullot:Malvinas^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Mar^shall^sullot:Mar^shall^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Mariánat:Mariána ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Masura^jávrrit:Masura^jáv'ri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Meavvtát:Meavvtá VARGGAT-plc ; !SUB
Muolkkut:Muolkku VARGGAT-plc ;
Muosát:Muosá VARGGAT-plc ;
Máhtte^geavŋŋis:Máhtte^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Ni^agara^goržžit:Ni^agara^gorž'ži ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Nikobar^sullot:Nikobar^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Njukča^bálggis:Njukča^bál'gis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Njárga^lássát:Njárga^lássá VARGGAT-plc ;
Nuorta^vuovllát:Nuorta^vuovllá VARGGAT-plc ;
Orkney^sullot:Orkney^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Preri^at:Preri^a ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Pyrene^a^várit:Pyrene^a^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Risát:Risá VARGGAT-plc ;
Rok^itno^jeakkit:Rok^itno^jeaggi ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Ruovat:Ruova ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Salomon^sullot:Salomon^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Searbbat:Searbba VARGGAT-plc ;
Sey^chell^sullot:Sey^chell^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Sieide^bálggis:Sieide^bál'gis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Sieinnus-Návggastat:Sieinnus-Návggastah'k ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Signy^sullot:Signy^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Skiellet:Skielle ALEUHTAT-plc ; !SUB
Skánik:Skáni SULLOT-plc ;
Skánit:Skáni VARGGAT-plc ; !SUB
Soloveck^sullot:Soloveck^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Stanley^goržžit:Stanley^gorž'ži ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Stanovoi^várit:Stanovoi^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Sunda^sullot:Sunda^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Tienšan^várit:Tienšan^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Ural^várit:Ural^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Verhojansk^várit:Verhojansk^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Victori^a^goržžit:Victori^a^gorž'ži ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Vinson^várit:Vinson^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Voagat:Voaga VARGGAT-plc ;
Vogat:Voga VARGGAT-plc ; !SUB
Vuolle-Geavŋŋis:Vuolle-Geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Vuolle^eatnamat:Vuolle^eat'nam8 EATNAMAT-plc ;
Vuolle^geavŋŋis:Vuolle^geavgŋis GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Vuovllát:Vuovllá VARGGAT-plc ;
Várggát:Várggá VARGGAT-plc ;
Ádjit:Ádji VARGGAT-plc ;
Áinnáid^sullot:Áinnáid^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Álppat:Ál'pa ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Čáhppes^lássát:Čáhppes^lássá VARGGAT-plc ;
